Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.550

Distinguished professorship trust fund program—"Private donation" defined.

For the purposes of RCW 28B.76.555 through 28B.76.590, "private donation" includes assessments by commodity commissions authorized to conduct research activities including but not limited to research studies authorized under RCW 15.66.030 and 15.65.040.

[ 2004 c 275 s 19; 1989 c 187 s 1. Formerly RCW 28B.10.859.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.